public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
SFX j0 ver piemo/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 ver pien/J0 aver
SFX j0 ver piene/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver pion/E0E1E2J0 aver
SFX j0 ver pione/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver piè/J0 aver
SFX j0 ver piène/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver pié/N0 aver
SFX j0 ver piémoe/K0 aver
SFX j0 ver piéu/O0 aver
SFX j0 ver ralo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rane/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ratu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rave/F0F1F2Q1Q2 gaver
SFX j0 ver raƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver remo/E0E1E2J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver resi/N0 gaver
SFX j0 ver resiu/O0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rimo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver risi/N0 gaver
SFX j0 ver risiu/O0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rà/F0F1F2J0L0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ràe/F0F1F2 gaver
SFX j0 ver ràvelo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ràvene/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ràveƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rè/J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rène/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ré/N0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rémoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rémome/G0G1G2 gaver
SFX j0 ver rémomene/G0G1G2 gaver
SFX j0 ver résimo/J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver résimoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver résitu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 ver réu/O0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rí/N0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ría/F0F1F2J0L0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríane/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríatu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríe/F0F1F2J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríelo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríene/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríeƚo/B0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rímoe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rísitu/M0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ríu/O0 gaver
SFX j0 ver rò/J0 gaver
SFX j0 ver ròe/K0 gaver
SFX j0 ver tu/M0 aver
SFX j0 ver ƚo/B0 aver

# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((des|re)(c|ti?)oler, (mal|re)voler)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2k0k1k2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2k0k1k2I0J0
SFX k0 Y 59
SFX k0 er éndome/G0 er
SFX k0 er éndomene/G0 er
SFX k0 er éntome/G0 er
SFX k0 er éntomene/G0 er
SFX k0 ler rave/F0 oler
SFX k0 ler remo/E0E1E2J0 oler
SFX k0 ler ren/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler rense oler
SFX k0 ler resi/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler resiu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler rimo/E0E1E2J0 oler
SFX k0 ler rion/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler rione/M0 oler
SFX k0 ler rionse oler
SFX k0 ler risen/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler risense oler
SFX k0 ler risi/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler rision/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler risione/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler risionse oler
SFX k0 ler risiu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler risié/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler risiéu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler rison/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler risone/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler risonse oler
SFX k0 ler rié/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler riéu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler ron/E0E1E2J0 oler
SFX k0 ler rone/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler ronme/G0G1 oler
SFX k0 ler rà/F0J0L0 oler
SFX k0 ler ràe/F0 oler
SFX k0 ler ràvene/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler rè/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler rène/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler ré/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler résimo/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler résimoe/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler résitu/M0 oler
SFX k0 ler réu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler rí/N0 oler
SFX k0 ler ría/F0J0L0 oler
SFX k0 ler ríane/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler ríatu/M0 oler
SFX k0 ler ríe/F0J0 oler
SFX k0 ler ríene/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler rísitu/M0 oler
SFX k0 ler ríu/O0 oler
SFX k0 ler rò/J0 oler
SFX k0 ler ròe/K0 oler
SFX k0 ler rónmene/G0 oler
SFX k0 lo ga [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo gi/F0L0 [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo gime/G0 [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo gimene/G0 [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo gitu/M0 [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo go/J0 [cit]òlo
SFX k0 lo gone/K0 [cit]òlo

# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((des|re)(c|ti?)oler, (mal|re)voler)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2k0k1k2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2k0k1k2I0J0
SFX k1 Y 19
SFX k1 er éndolo/G1 er
SFX k1 er éndomelo/G1 er
SFX k1 er éntolo/G1 er
SFX k1 er éntomelo/G1 er
SFX k1 ler rave-lo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler relo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler rà-lo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ràe-lo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ràelo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ràvelo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ríe-lo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ríelo/B0 oler
SFX k1 ler ríselo/Q1 oler
SFX k1 ler rónmelo/G1 oler
SFX k1 lo ge-lo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k1 lo gelo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k1 lo gi-lo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k1 lo gilo/B0G1 [cit]òlo
SFX k1 lo gimelo/G1 [cit]òlo

# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((des|re)(c|ti?)oler, (mal|re)voler)
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2k0k1k2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2k0k1k2I0J0
SFX k2 Y 19
SFX k2 er éndomeƚo/G2 er
SFX k2 er éndoƚo/G2 er
SFX k2 er éntomeƚo/G2 er
SFX k2 er éntoƚo/G2 er
SFX k2 ler rave-ƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler reƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler rà-ƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ràe-ƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ràeƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ràveƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ríe-ƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ríeƚo/B0 oler
SFX k2 ler ríseƚo/Q2 oler
SFX k2 ler rónmeƚo/G2 oler
SFX k2 lo ge-ƚo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k2 lo geƚo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k2 lo gi-ƚo/B0 [cit]òlo
SFX k2 lo gimeƚo/G2 [cit]òlo
SFX k2 lo giƚo/B0G2 [cit]òlo

# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((a|apar|as|de|inkon|intra|kon|man|o|re|sos|tra)[ctv]èñer)
# themeT1 + r/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
SFX l0 Y 26
SFX l0 èñer ièn/E0E1E2F0F1F2J0L0 [^c]èñer
SFX l0 èñer iènme/G0G1G2 [^c]èñer
SFX l0 èñer iènmene/G0G1G2 [^c]èñer
SFX l0 èñer ièntu/M0 [^c]èñer
SFX l0 èñer iòr/E0E1E2 tèñer
SFX l0 èñer iòrme/G0G1G2 tèñer
SFX l0 èñer iòrmene/G0G1G2 tèñer
SFX l0 èñer òr/E0E1E2 [ct]èñer
SFX l0 èñer òrme/G0G1G2 [ct]èñer
SFX l0 èñer òrmene/G0G1G2 [ct]èñer
SFX l0 éñer en/E0E1E2F0F1F2J0L0 éñer
SFX l0 éñer enme/G0G1G2 éñer
SFX l0 éñer entu/M0 éñer
SFX l0 éñer ien/E0E1E2F0F1F2J0L0 [^c]éñer
SFX l0 éñer ienme/G0G1G2 [^c]éñer
SFX l0 éñer ior/E0E1E2 téñer
SFX l0 éñer iorme/G0G1G2 téñer
SFX l0 éñer iormene/G0G1G2 téñer
SFX l0 éñer iénmene/G0G1G2 [^c]éñer
SFX l0 éñer or/E0E1E2 [ct]éñer
SFX l0 éñer orme/G0G1G2 [ct]éñer
SFX l0 éñer ormene/G0G1G2 [ct]éñer
SFX l0 ñer n/E0E1E2F0F1F2J0L0 èñer
SFX l0 ñer nme/G0G1G2 èñer
SFX l0 ñer nmene/G0G1G2 [èé]ñer
SFX l0 ñer ntu/M0 èñer
