public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
voƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2‘0.0
benvoler/a0a1k0k1E0E1
malvoler/a0a1k0k1E0E1
malvoƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2
ʼñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
vèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2+0.0@0
arvèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intervèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intravèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
konvèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2+0*0
kontravèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
pervèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
rinvèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
sovèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2.0
soravèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
véñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2+0.0,0@0
arvéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intervéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intravéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
konvéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2+0*0
kontravéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
pervéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
rinvéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
sovéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2.0
soravéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
toler/a0a1k0k1E0E1+0.0
tolo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
toƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2+0.0
tioler/a0a1k0k1E0E1+0.0
tiolo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
tiòlo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
tioƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2+0.0
colo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
còlo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
coƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2+0.0
coƚo/a0k0k2E0E2J0+0.0
tèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2.0,0@0:0
apartèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
astèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
inkontèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intratèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
mantèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2r0
otèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
sostèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
tratèñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
téñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2.0,0@0:0
apartéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
astéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
inkontéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
intratéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
mantéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
otéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
sostéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
tratéñer/b0b1b2l0E0E1E2
